Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.020

Election on disincorporation—Receiver.

The legislative body shall cause the proposition of disincorporation to be submitted to the voters at the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days, or at a special election called for that purpose not less than ninety days, nor more than one hundred and eighty days, after the certification of sufficiency of the petition, or the passage of the resolution, as the case may be. If the code city has any indebtedness or outstanding liabilities, the legislative body shall provide for election of a receiver at the same election.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.020.]